Tennessee, session 114, SB1575.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-44-103, is amended by adding the
following new subsection (d):
(d)
(1) In lieu of providing adequate notice by publication in a newspaper of general
circulation or by other means, a governmental body may provide adequate notice by
publishing notice of the meeting on a secure internet website of the governmental body,
if available.
(2) If the governmental body publishes an e-newsletter or its notices online, the
governmental body shall establish a mechanism by which a person may sign up to
receive such notices and e-newsletters by electronic mail or, alternatively, to receive a
hard copy by regular mail.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1575
010550
- 1 -